src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 3_DERIVED_VBACK   !!= * __@CODE@__

+V+Inf:^VBACK%>iđ K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^VBACK%>âm K ; !
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^VBACK%>ah K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^VBACK^RLEN K ; ! ^RLEN^SLEN    K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:^VBACK%>een K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:^VBACK%>vettee K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:^VBACK%>ává   K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^VBACK%>ep K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^VBACK%>vetteđ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VBACK%>eh K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^VBACK%>im K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:^VBACK%>ih K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:^VBACK%>ij    K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:^VBACK%>áim K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:^VBACK%>áid K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:^VBACK%>áin  K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^VBACK%>ijm K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^VBACK%>ijd K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^VBACK%>ii K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1:^VBACK%>iččim K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2:^VBACK%>iččih K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3:^VBACK%>ičij K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+Du1:^VBACK%>iččijm K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth:^VBACK%>iččiijm K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Du2:^VBACK%>iččijd K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Du2+Err/Orth:^VBACK%>iččiijd K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Du3:^VBACK%>iččijn K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Du3+Err/Orth:^VBACK%>iččiijn K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1:^VBACK%>iččijm K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2:^VBACK%>iččijd K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3:^VBACK%>iččii K ;

+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1:^VBACK%>ižžeem K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2:^VBACK%>ižžeeh K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3:^VBACK%>iš K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Du1:^VBACK%>ižžeen K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Du2:^VBACK%>išvettee K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Du3:^VBACK%>ižává K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1:^VBACK%>ižžep K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^VBACK%>išvetteđ K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3:^VBACK%>ižeh K ;

+V+Imprt+Sg1:^VBACK%>um K ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2:^VBACK K ;
+V+Imprt+Sg3:^VBACK%>us K ;
+V+Imprt+Du1:^VBACK%>oon K ;
+V+Imprt+Du2:^VBACK%>ee K ;
+V+Imprt+Du3:^VBACK%>us K ;
+V+Imprt+Pl1:^VBACK%>op K ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:^VBACK%>iđ K ;
+V+Imprt+Pl3:^VBACK%>us K ;

+V+PrsPrc:^VBACK%> IJJE_PRSPRC ;
+V+PrfPrc:^VBACK%>âm K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^VBACK^RLEN K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^VBACK%>âm K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:^VBACK%>iččii K ;
+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:^VBACK%>ižžii K ;
+V+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;

+V+VAbess:^VBACK VABESS ;
+V+VAbess+Err/Orth:^VBACK%>hinnáá K ;
+V+VAbess+Err/Orth:^VBACK%>hennáá K ;

+V+Actio+Nom:^VBACK%>em NOMACT ;
+V+Actio+Ill:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>mân K ;
+V+Actio+Loc:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>mist K ;
+V+Actio+Com:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>máin K ;
+V+Actio+Ess:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>min K ;
+V+Ger:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>dijn K ;
+V+Ger+PxSg1:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>dijnân K ;
+V+Ger+PxSg2:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>dijnâd K ;
+V+Ger+PxSg3:^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN%>dijnis K ;
+V+Der4+Der/NomAct:^VBACK FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;
+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:^VBACKei4je C_TAHHEE ;
+V+Der4+Der/InchL:i6^WG^VBACK%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !joođeetškuođij hmm
+V+Der1+Der/st:^VBACKist 4_ADELISTID ; !
+V+Der1+Der/Caus:^VBACKitt 4_ADELISTID ; !
+V+Der3+Der/Pass:^VBACK C_MERIDUD ;


!DERL LEXICON 3_DERIVED_L_RLEN_CLEN   !!= * __@CODE@__
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Inf:^CSH%>iđ K ;	! viirrâđ > virâliđ
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^CSH%>âm K ; ! virâlâm
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^CSH%>ah K ; ! virâlâm
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^RLEN K ; ! ^RLEN^SLEN    K ; ! viirrâl
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Du1:^CSH%>een K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Du2:^RLEN%>vettee K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Du3:^CSH%>ává   K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^CSH%>ep K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^RLEN%>vetteđ K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^CSH%>eh K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^CSH%>im K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:^CSH%>ih K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:^CSH%>ij    K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Du1:^CSH%>áim K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Du2:^CSH%>áid K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Du3:^CSH%>áin  K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^CSH%>ijm K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^CSH%>ijd K ;
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^CSH%>ii K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Sg1:^CSH%>iččim K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Sg2:^CSH%>iččih K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Sg3:^CSH%>ičij K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du1:^CSH%>iččijm K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth:^CSH%>iččiijm K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du2:^CSH%>iččijd K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du2+Err/Orth:^CSH%>iččiijd K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du3:^CSH%>iččijn K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Du3+Err/Orth:^CSH%>iččiijn K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Pl1:^CSH%>iččijm K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Pl2:^CSH%>iččijd K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+Pl3:^CSH%>iččii K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Sg1:^CSH%>ižžeem K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Sg2:^CSH%>ižžeeh K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Sg3:^CSH%>iš K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Du1:^CSH%>ižžeen K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Du2:^CSH%>išvettee K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Du3:^CSH%>ižává K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Pl1:^CSH%>ižžep K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Pl2:^CSH%>išvetteđ K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+Pl3:^CSH%>ižeh K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Imprt+Sg1:^CSH%>um K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Sg2:^RLEN K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Sg3:^CSH%>us K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Du1:^CSH%>oon K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Du2:^CSH%>ee K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Du3:^CSH%>us K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Pl1:^CSH%>op K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Pl2:^CSH%>iđ K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+Pl3:^CSH%>us K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+PrsPrc:^CSH%>eijjee K ;
!DERL +V+PrsPrc+Use/NG:^CSH%>ijjee K ;
!DERL +V+PrfPrc:^CSH%>âm K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^RLEN K ; ! ^SLEN
!DERL +V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^CSH%>âm K ;
!DERL +V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:^CSH%>iččii K ;
!DERL +V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:^CSH%>ižžii K ;
!DERL +V+Imprt+ConNeg:^RLEN K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+VAbess:^RLEN VABESS ;
!DERL +V+VAbess+Err/Orth:^RLEN%>hinnáá K ;
!DERL +V+VAbess+Err/Orth:^RLEN%>hennáá K ;
!DERL 
!DERL +V+Actio+Nom:^CSH%>em K ;
!DERL +V+Actio+Ill:^CSH%>mân K ;
!DERL +V+Actio+Loc:^CSH%>mist K ;
!DERL +V+Actio+Com:^CSH%>máin K ;
!DERL +V+Actio+Ess:^CSH%>min K ;
!DERL +V+Ger:^WG%>dijn K ;
!DERL +V+Ger+PxSg1:^WG%>dijnân K ;
!DERL +V+Ger+PxSg2:^WG%>dijnâd K ;
!DERL +V+Ger+PxSg3:^WG%>dijnis K ;
!DERL +V+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;
!DERL +V+Der2+Der/NomAg:^WGei4je C_TAHHEE ;
!DERL +V+Der4+Der/InchL:i6^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !joođeetškuođij hmm
!DERL +V+Der1+Der/st:^WGist 4_ADELISTID ; !
!DERL +V+Der1+Der/Caus:^WGitt 4_ADELISTID ; !
!DERL +V+Der3+Der/Pass:%> C_MERIDUD ;
!DERL 

!! !!Contracted stems
! ----------------

!! ! j stems


LEXICON C_COKKAD
+V: C_COKKAD_V ;
LEXICON C_COKKAD_IV
+V+IV: C_COKKAD_V ;
LEXICON C_COKKAD_TV
+V+TV: C_COKKAD_V ;

LEXICON C_COKKAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__
 VINF_SHORT_VOW ; ! Trond: Fix
:á VINF_LONG_VOW ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:áškyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !kulluuškuođij
+Der1+Der/tt:átt 3_COKKIITTID ; !rahhiittiđ ruvviittiđ
+Der1+Der/st:ást 3_COKKIITTID ; !ruvviistiđ
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:á^SLEN DER_MAS ; ! čokkáámâš
+Der3+Der/Pass: C_PASS_LONG ;


+Cond+Prs:á EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs:á CONTR_POT ;
+Imprt: CONTR_IMPRT ;

+PrsPrc:%>j IJJE_PRSPRC ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ám K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>áh K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>á K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jeen K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>ávettee K ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>v K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ávetteđ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>jeh K ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>jih  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>im  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>id K ;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>in  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id  K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jii  K ;

LEXICON C_PASS_LONG  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+V+IV+Inf:ju%>đ K ;

!+V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct:

+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1:juvvo%>jin K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2:juvvo%>jih K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:juvvo%>o K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1:juu%>m K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2:
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3:
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:juvvo%>jx K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:juvvo%>jx K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3:juvvo%>jeh K ;

+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1:juvvojim K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2:juvvojih K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:jui K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1:juim K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2:juid K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3:juin K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2:juim K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2:juid K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3:juvvo%>jii K ;


+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:juu	     K ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:jum	     K ;
+V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:juuččii	     K ;
+V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:južžii	     K ;

+V+IV+PrsPrc:juvvee		     K ;
+V+IV+PrfPrc:jum			     K ;
+V+IV+VAbess:juu VABESS ;
+V+IV+Actio+Nom:jume			     K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Gen:jume			     K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Loc:juumeest	     K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Com:juumáin	     K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ill:juumán	     K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ess:jummeen	     K ;
+V+IV+Ger:juudijn	     K ;
+V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct:j#u^RVm^RCe 2NJUNE ; !TEST


LEXICON C_PALLAD
+V: C_PALLAD_V ;
LEXICON C_PALLAD_IV
+V+IV: C_PALLAD_V ;
LEXICON C_PALLAD_TV
+V+TV: C_PALLAD_V ;
