src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
tituleerađ:tituleera C_PALLAD_TV "tituleerata" ;
rimmađ:rimma C_PALLAD "rimmata" ;
vloggađ:vlogga C_PALLAD_IV ;
surffađ:surffa C_PALLAD_IV "surffata" ;
čattađ:čatta C_PALLAD_IV "chattailla" ;
liftađ:lifta C_PALLAD_IV "liftata" ;
arvađ:arva C_PALLAD_IV ;
palvađ:palva C_PALLAD "palvata" ;
avrađ:avra C_PALLAD_TV ;
bloggađ:blogga C_PALLAD_IV "blogata" ;
bongađ:bonga C_PALLAD_TV "bongata" ;
cirgáđ:cirgá C_COKKAD_IV ;
ciäggáđ:ciäggá C_COKKAD_IV ;
ciähháđ:ciähhá C_COKKAD_IV ;
ciŋkkáđ:ciŋkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
fiskáđ:fiská C_COKKAD_TV ;
fiđgáđ:fiđgá C_COKKAD ;
fáškáđ:fášká C_COKKAD ;
grillađ:grilla C_PALLAD_IV ;
kroolađ:kroola C_PALLAD_IV ;
hamstrađ:hamstra C_PALLAD ; ! q YAML
harjađ:harja C_PALLAD ;
harttađ:hartta C_PALLAD ;
hiäŋgáđ:hiäŋgá C_COKKAD_IV ;
hoittáđ:hoittá C_COKKAD_TV ;
huiláđ:huilá C_COKKAD ;
huttáđ:huttá C_COKKAD_IV ;
hámmáđ:hámmá C_COKKAD ;
jalkkađ:jalkka C_PALLAD ;
jammađ:jamma C_PALLAD "jammata" ;
jaŋgađ:jaŋga C_PALLAD ;
jottáđ:jottá C_COKKAD_IV ;
jááváđ:jáává C_COKKAD ;
kaivađ:kai4va C_PALLAD_TV ;
kavrađ:kavra C_PALLAD ;
kaŋkkađ:kaŋkka C_PALLAD ;
killáđ:killá C_COKKAD_TV ;
koccáđ:koccá C_COKKAD_IV ;
koodađ:kooda C_PALLAD ;
kuhmáđ:kuhmá C_COKKAD ;
kuikkáđ:kuikká C_COKKAD_IV ;
kuppáđ:kuppá C_COKKAD_TV ;
kurppáđ:kurppá C_COKKAD ;
kuáhtáđ:kuáhtá C_COKKAD_TV ;
kuálkkáđ:kuálkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
kuárváđ:kuárvá C_COKKAD ;
kuáŋkkáđ:kuáŋkká C_COKKAD_TV ;
kárgáđ:kárgá C_COKKAD_IV ;
kávkkáđ:kávkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
lakkađ:lakka C_PALLAD ;
lastađ:lasta C_PALLAD_TV ;
leuddađ:leudda C_PALLAD "leuddata" ;
lijmáđ:lijmá C_COKKAD ;
liäbbáđ:liäbbá C_COKKAD_IV ;
liäškáđ:liäšká C_COKKAD ;
luávkkáđ:luávkká C_COKKAD_TV ;
luđgáđ:luđgá C_COKKAD ;
meinađ:meina C_PALLAD_IV ;
miähkáđ:miähká C_COKKAD_IV ;
miästáđ:miästá C_COKKAD_TV ;
moijáđ:moijá C_COKKAD_IV ;
muvráđ:muvrá C_COKKAD_TV ;
muvzáđ:muvzá C_COKKAD_IV ;
muštáđ:muštá C_COKKAD ;
mááláđ:máálá C_COKKAD_TV ;
njavvađ:njavva C_PALLAD ;
njaŋgađ:njaŋga C_PALLAD ;
njibžáđ:njibžá C_COKKAD ;
njiäzzáđ:njiäzzá C_COKKAD_IV ;
nolláđ:nollá C_COKKAD ;
pakkađ:pakka C_PALLAD_TV ;
pallađ:palla C_PALLAD_IV "pelästyä" ; ! q YAML
parfađ:parfa C_PALLAD_IV ;
pavŋađ:pavŋa C_PALLAD ;
pijssáđ:pijssá C_COKKAD_IV ;
piälkkáđ:piälkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
poggáđ:poggá C_COKKAD ;
pooráđ:poorá C_COKKAD_TV ;
pulččáđ:pulččá C_COKKAD ;
pumppáđ:pumppá C_COKKAD_TV ;
puohađ:puoha C_PALLAD ;
puálláđ:puállá C_COKKAD_IV ;
puŋkkáđ:puŋkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
pánttáđ:pánttá C_COKKAD_TV ;
pássáđ:pássá C_COKKAD ;
pávháđ:pávhá C_COKKAD_IV ;
ramččađ:ramčča C_PALLAD ;
rijttáđ:rijttá C_COKKAD_IV ;
rijváđ:rijvá C_COKKAD_TV ;
rimččáđ:rimččá C_COKKAD_TV ;
riäiháđ:riäihá C_COKKAD ;
riččáđ:riččá C_COKKAD ;
ruvgáđ:ruvgá C_COKKAD ;
ruvnáđ:ruvná C_COKKAD_TV ;
ruáđđáđ:ruáđđá C_COKKAD ;
ruškáđ:rušká C_COKKAD_IV ;
ráiváđ:ráivá C_COKKAD ;
saddađ:sadda C_PALLAD ;
salkkađ:salkka C_PALLAD_TV ;
skarppađ:skarppa C_PALLAD ;
skeittađ:skeitta C_PALLAD "skeitata" ;
skilkkáđ:skilkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
skuálkkáđ:skuálkká C_COKKAD_IV ;
skuánnáđ:skuánná C_COKKAD ;
sorváđ:sorvá C_COKKAD ;
sruuváđ:sruuvá C_COKKAD_TV ;
stanccađ:stancca C_PALLAD ;
starttađ:startta C_PALLAD_TV ;
stiiváđ:stiivá C_COKKAD ;
stiämmáđ:stiämmá C_COKKAD ;
stubbáđ:stubbá C_COKKAD "upota lumeen" ;
sáhháđ:sáhhá C_COKKAD_TV ; ! q !YAML
tarrađ:tarra C_PALLAD ;
taŋkkađ:taŋkka C_PALLAD_TV ;
tekstađ:teksta C_PALLAD_TV ;
testađ:testa C_PALLAD_TV "testata" ;
tiiláđ:tiilá C_COKKAD_TV ;
tilkkáđ:tilkká C_COKKAD_TV ;
tiänáđ:tiäná C_COKKAD ;
tulláđ:tullá C_COKKAD_TV ;
turppáđ:turppá C_COKKAD ;
tuškáđ:tušká C_COKKAD ;
tánssáđ:tánssá C_COKKAD_TV ;
vannađ:vanna C_PALLAD ;
vardađ:varda C_PALLAD_TV ;
veivađ:vei4va C_PALLAD ; !¢veivaam
velttađ:veltta C_PALLAD ;
vijláđ:vijlá C_COKKAD ;
virkkađ:virkka C_PALLAD_TV ;
viälgáđ:viälgá C_COKKAD_IV ;
viälláđ:viällá C_COKKAD_IV ;
vuáppáđ:vuáppá C_COKKAD_IV ;
vuáváđ:vuává C_COKKAD_TV ;
várdáđ:várdá C_COKKAD ;
čiäskáđ:čiäská C_COKKAD_TV ;
čokkáđ:čokká C_COKKAD_IV "istua" ; ! !YAML
čuináđ:čuiná C_COKKAD ;
čurttáđ:čurttá C_COKKAD_IV ;
čuávjáđ:čuávjá C_COKKAD ;
šiälláđ:šiällá C_COKKAD_IV ;
šiärráđ:šiärrá C_COKKAD_IV ;
špuákkáđ:špuákká C_COKKAD_IV ;
šuáláđ:šuálá C_COKKAD_TV ;
šuávváđ:šuávvá C_COKKAD ;
šááráđ:šáárá C_COKKAD_IV ;
